Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6246.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-2-35 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-2 entitled "General
Powers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-2-35. Town of New Shoreham — Landing fee.
The town of New Shoreham is hereby authorized to charge, assess, or otherwise collect a
fifty cent ($.50) one dollar ($1.00) landing fee on each passenger over the age of twelve (12)
arriving on Block Island by public or private boat. All fees collected less expenses of collection
shall be utilized by the town of New Shoreham to promote the health, safety, and welfare of all
passengers, including, but not limited to, emergency medical services, acquisition of property to
support tourism related activities, to construct and maintain tourism support facilities, and to
establish a fund to assist the town of New Shoreham in resolving problems which may arise due to
growth in the tourism industry. The town may enter into agreements with any common carrier
serving the town of New Shoreham and any operator of a marina in the town of New Shoreham
authorizing the carrier or marina operator to collect the landing fee on behalf of the town of New
Shoreham. The agreement may provide for the payment of a fee by the town for the carrier or
marina operator and the indemnification of the carrier or marina operator from and against any
liability to, or claim of liability by third parties, arising from collection of the landing fee. Any
common carrier may collect the landing fee on behalf of the town of New Shoreham by including
the amount of the fee in its rate and charge to passengers without the necessity of approval of the
landing fee from the public utilities commission or the division of public utilities and carriers under

title 39. The landing fee authorized by this chapter does not apply to any persons receiving free
transportation from a public utility under § 39-2-5. The town council of the town of New Shoreham
shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002770
========
LC002770 - Page 2 of 3